apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
	 <pardef n="بول__vblex_tv">
      <e>       <p><l>ونگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ونگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کر</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
         </pardef>

	<e lm="چق"><i>چق</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="رکھ"><i>رکھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھوم"><i>گھوم</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="تلاش"><i>تلاش</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کلک"><i>کلک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چاہ"><i>چاہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھوج"><i>کھوج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھیل"><i>کھیل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سن"><i>سن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سوچ"><i>سوچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھیج"><i>بھیج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پوچھ"><i>پوچھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="لکھ"><i>لکھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پہنچ"><i>پہنچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کہہ"><i>کہہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="آنک"><i>آنک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کاٹ"><i>کاٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کچل"><i>کچل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="خرید"><i>خرید</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھرچ"><i>کھرچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھول"><i>کھول</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گڑھ"><i>گڑھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھسیٹ"><i>گھسیٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھور"><i>گھور</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چکھ"><i>چکھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چاٹ"><i>چاٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چگ"><i>چگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چپڑ"><i>چپڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چوس"><i>چوس</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھان"><i>چھان</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھڑک"><i>چھڑک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھیل"><i>چھیل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھوڑ"><i>چھوڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جانچ"><i>جانچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جوڑ"><i>جوڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھٹک"><i>جھٹک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھیل"><i>جھیل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹانک"><i>ٹانک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹال"><i>ٹال</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹھگ"><i>ٹھگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈس"><i>ڈس</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="طاق"><i>طاق</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="دعا"><i>دہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="دھدھک"><i>دھدھک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="دھن"><i>دھن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="نچوڑ"><i>نچوڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="نباہ"><i>نباہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پٹک"><i>پٹک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پہن"><i>پہن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پیٹ"><i>پیٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پوج"><i>پوج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھوڑ"><i>پھوڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بگاڑ"><i>بگاڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بین"><i>بین</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بیچ"><i>بیچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="مانگ"><i>مانگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="رٹ"><i>رٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سینچ"><i>سینچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہڑپ"><i>ہڑپ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چن"><i>چن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پہچان"><i>پہچان</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پال"><i>پال</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بیچ"><i>بیچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="نکال"><i>نکال</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="مان"><i>مان</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بانٹ"><i>بانٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پڈھ"><i>پڈھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھگڑ"><i>جھگڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="روک"><i>روک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سنبھال"><i>سنبھال</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="تاگ"><i>تاگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھل"><i>کھل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھیل"><i>پھیل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈکار"><i>ڈکار</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کاٹ"><i>کاٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="اینٹھ"><i>اینٹھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ابال"><i>ابال</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="اچھل"><i>اچھل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="رینک"><i>رینک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھاڑ"><i>پھاڑ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سنوار"><i>سنوار</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سرک"><i>سرک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="خرید"><i>خرید</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈانٹ"><i>ڈانٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="اپج"><i>اپج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھانس"><i>پھانس</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھین"><i>چھین</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سونپ"><i>سونپ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چانٹ"><i>چانٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بیچ"><i>بیچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="لپٹ"><i>لپٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گر"><i>گر</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گڑھ"><i>گڑھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈھاک"><i>ڈھاک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="رینگ"><i>رینگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھانٹ"><i>چھانٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کٹ"><i>کٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹھگ"><i>ٹھگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="تیاگ"><i>تیاگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="اوڑھ"><i>اوڑھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سہ"><i>سہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="رنگ"><i>رنگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="عقیر"><i>اکیر</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="تھوپ"><i>تھوپ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈھونڈ"><i>ڈھونڈ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پلٹ"><i>پلٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھانجھ"><i>بھانجھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہانپھ"><i>ہانپھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھکوس"><i>بھکوس</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="خیز"><i>کھیج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="لٹک"><i>لٹک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چیر"><i>چیر</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹانگ"><i>ٹانگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈنٹ"><i>ڈنٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="لاندھ"><i>لاندھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بن"><i>بن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ترس"><i>ترس</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ماپ"><i>ماپ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہٹ"><i>ہٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھڑک"><i>پھڑک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چگ"><i>چگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھرچ"><i>کھرچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ڈوب"><i>ڈوب</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="طعن"><i>طعن</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹہل"><i>ٹہل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="خرید"><i>خرید</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بوجھ"><i>بوجھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گونج"><i>گونج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھینٹ"><i>پھینٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھنٹ"><i>چھنٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="بنٹ"><i>بنٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹانک"><i>ٹانک</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="داغ"><i>داغ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سونگھ"><i>سونگھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="کات"><i>کات</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="جوجھ"><i>جوجھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سوج"><i>سوج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گاہ"><i>گاہ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھسٹ"><i>گھسٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹھاگ"><i>ٹھاگ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گانٹھ"><i>گانٹھ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="مانج"><i>مانج</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="لوٹ"><i>لوٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="سمیٹ"><i>سمیٹ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="گود"><i>گود</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="اگل"><i>اگل</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="پکھار"><i>پکھار</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
	<e lm="موچ"><i>موچ</i><par n="بول__vblex_tv"/></e>
